klpt/data/kmr-Latn.dic
anî/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:an lem:anîn
awandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:aw lem:awandin
axivî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:axiv lem:axivîn
barand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:bar lem:barandin
bawerandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:bawer lem:bawerandin
bawişkî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:bawişk lem:bawişkîn
bijand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:bij lem:bijandin
bijî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:bij lem:bijîn
bizivand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:biziv lem:bizivandin
bişirandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:bişir lem:bişirandin
bişirî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:bişir lem:bişirîn
bîstûneh/E po:num st:bîst
bîstûçar/E po:num st:bîst
camisî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:camis lem:camisîn
cehimand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:cehim lem:cehimandin
civirand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:civir lem:civirandin
civî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:civ lem:civîn
damikand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:damik lem:damikandin
damikandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:damik lem:damikandin
dazdeh/E po:num st:da
dehûyek/E po:num st:deh
deqand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:deq lem:deqandin
diwanzde/E po:num st:diwan
donze/E po:num st:don
dudeh/E po:num st:dudeh
duwanzde/E po:num st:duwan
eciband/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:ecib lem:ecibandin
eciqî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:eciq lem:eciqîn
edilandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:edil lem:edilandin
farisand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:faris lem:farisandin
fetilî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:fetil lem:fetilîn
firdikî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:firdik lem:firdikîn
firotin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:firot lem:firotin
fitilî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:fitil lem:fitilîn
fîkand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:fîk lem:fîkandin
gerî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:ger lem:gerîn
girî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:gir lem:girîn
gonand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:gon lem:gonandin
guherandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:guher lem:guherandin
hat/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:hat lem:hatin
heft/E po:num st:heft
heftêûdu/E po:num st:heftê
heftêûpênc/E po:num st:heftê
heftêûşeş/E po:num st:heftê
helmandin/XF po:verb
helî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:hel lem:helîn
herikand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:herik lem:herikandin
hetikî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:hetik lem:hetikîn
hevdeh/E po:num st:hevdeh
hewesandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:hewes lem:hewesandin
heşand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:heş lem:heşandin
heştêûdu/E po:num st:heştê
heştêûpênc/E po:num st:heştê
heştêûşeş/E po:num st:heştê
hilîn/XF po:verb
huvde/E po:num st:huv
hêçandin/XF po:verb
jimart/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:jimar lem:hejmartin
keftin/XF po:verb
kenî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:ken lem:kenîn
kerrixî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:kerrix lem:kerrixîn
kiland/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:kil lem:kilandin
kizîn/XF po:verb
kurdand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:kurd lem:kurdandin
lebitî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:lebit lem:lebitîn
lewerandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:lewer lem:lewerandin
lipitî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:lipit lem:lipitîn
loqand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:loq lem:loqandin
lîst/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:lîst lem:lîstin
lûsandin/XF po:verb
milyar/E po:num st:milyar
minminand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:minm lem:minminandin
mir/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:mir lem:mirin
misandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:mis lem:misandin
nehwet/E po:num st:nehwet
nermijand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:nermij lem:nermijandin
nerîn/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:ner lem:nerîn
niçand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:niç lem:niçandin
norandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:nor lem:norandin
notûdu/E po:num st:not
notûpênc/E po:num st:not
notûşeş/E po:num st:not
panzdeh/E po:num st:pan
pelixî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:pelix lem:pelixîn
pengand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:peng lem:pengandin
perixandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:perix lem:perixandin
perçiqî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:perçiq lem:perçiqîn
peşkand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:peşk lem:peşkandin
pistandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:pist lem:pistandin
pênce/E po:num st:pênc
pêncî/E po:num st:pênc
pêncîûneh/E po:num st:pênc
pîpikand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:pîpik lem:pîpikandin
qefilandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:qefil lem:qefilandin
qefilî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:qefil lem:qefilîn
qelipî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:qelip lem:qelipîn
qerimand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:qerim lem:qerimandin
qewirî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:qewir lem:qewirîn
qijilandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:qijil lem:qijilandin
qutifand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:qutif lem:qutifandin
qutifî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:qutif lem:qutifîn
raserîn/XF po:verb
reşand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:reş lem:reşandin
rihilî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:rihil lem:rihilîn
rikandin/XF po:verb
sanî/E po:num st:sanî
sediqand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:sediq lem:sediqandin
sedûçar/E po:num st:sed
selmandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:selm lem:selmandin
sincirî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:sincir lem:sincirîn
sirand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:sir lem:sirandin
sêwirandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:sêwir lem:sêwirandin
sî/E po:num st:sî
sîûsê/E po:num st:sî
tepand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:tep lem:tepandin
teskîn/XF po:verb
tirsî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:tirs lem:tirsîn
vebirrîn/XF po:verb
veserand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:veser lem:veserandin
viritandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:virit lem:viritandin
xebitî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:xebit lem:xebitîn
xelandin/XF po:verb
xemiland/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:xemil lem:xemilandin
xofîn/XF po:verb
xurand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:xur lem:xurandin
xuş/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:xuş lem:xuşîn
yazde/E po:num st:ya
zelî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:zel lem:zelîn
zerandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:zer lem:zerandin
zirviçand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:zirviç lem:zirviçandin
zivirrî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:zivirr lem:zivirrîn
çarem/E po:num st:çarem
çelpandin/XF po:verb
çerî/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:çer lem:çerîn
çilûsê/E po:num st:çil
çirisî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:çiris lem:çirisîn
çirpandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:çirp lem:çirpandin
çêjand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:çêj lem:çêjandin
şazde/E po:num st:şa
şemitandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:şemit lem:şemitandin
şemitî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:şemit lem:şemitîn
şewitî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:şewit lem:şewitîn
şiband/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:şib lem:şibandin
şêlandin/XF po:verb
şêstûneh/E po:num st:şêst
2/EJ po:numeral
6/EJ po:numeral
